Utah statutes.
53-3-222.   Purpose of revocation or suspension for driving under the influence.

The Legislature finds that the purpose of this title relating to suspension or revocation of a person's license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle for driving with a blood alcohol content above a certain level or while under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or a combination of alcohol and any drug, or for refusing to take a chemical test as provided in Section 41-6a-520, is protecting persons on highways by quickly removing from the highways those persons who have shown they are safety hazards.

